Indiana, session 2026, SB234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-24.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 24.5. (a) As used in this section, "energy
utility" means:
(1) an electric utility listed in 170 IAC 4-7-2(a) and any
successor in interest to that utility; or
(2) a corporation organized under IC 8-1-13.
(b) As used in this section, "large load customer" means a new
or existing customer of an energy utility, or not more than four (4)
multiple new or existing customers of an energy utility, that
requests new or additional electricity demand that in the aggregate
exceeds the lesser of:
(1) five percent (5%) of the energy utility's average peak
demand over the most recent three (3) calendar years; or
(2) one hundred fifty (150) megawatts.
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


(c) As used in this section, "project" refers to a project relating
to energy infrastructure or generation resources that:
(1) are required primarily to serve a large load customer of an
energy utility; and
(2) may be designed to serve more than one (1) large load
customer of the energy utility or to meet other customer
demand or energy needs.
(d) As used in this section, "project costs" means the total costs
of a project, including:
(1) planning costs; and
(2) construction and operating costs;
related to the project.
(e) Any standard tariff offered by an energy utility after March
14, 2026, to a large load customer of the energy utility must include
a provision that requires reimbursement by the large load
customer of all project costs reasonably allocable to the large load
customer, regardless of whether the large load customer ultimately
takes service in any anticipated amount and within any anticipated
time frame.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-2-42.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 42.4. (a) This section
applies to a proceeding that:
(1) is filed with; or
(2) is pending before;
the commission after December 31, 2025, for a change in an energy
utility's basic rates and charges for retail electric service or retail
natural gas service.
(b) As used in this section, "energy utility" means a person,
however organized, that:
(1) provides retail:
(A) electric; or
(B) natural gas;
service to the public; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
(c) As used in this section, "relevant period" means the period
that:
(1) includes the last month of an energy utility's twelve (12)
month test period used in a proceeding described in
subsection (a); and
(2) extends through the longer of the:
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


(A) immediately preceding fifty-nine (59) months; or
(B) period beginning with the first full month following the
last order issued by the commission in which the energy
utility's basic rates and charges were approved.
(d) As used in this section, "seasonally adjusted energy prices
for the United States" refers to:
(1) seasonally adjusted electricity prices; or
(2) seasonally adjusted utility (piped) gas service prices;
as applicable to an energy utility, for the United States as measured
by the Consumer Price Index, as published by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(e) In a proceeding subject to this section, the commission shall
determine the average monthly percentage change in seasonally
adjusted energy prices for the United States over the course of the
relevant period. If the percentage change in seasonally adjusted
energy prices for the United States is:
(1) a negative number or zero (0), representing no change or
a decrease in seasonally adjusted energy prices for the United
States over the course of the relevant period, the commission
may not issue an order in the proceeding that would result,
upon full implementation, in an increase in an energy utility's
basic rates and charges for any customer class; or
(2) a positive number, representing an increase in seasonally
adjusted energy prices for the United States over the course
of the relevant period, the commission:
(A) may not issue an order in the proceeding that would
result, upon full implementation, in an increase in an
energy utility's basic rates and charges, for any customer
class, that exceeds the average monthly percentage change
in seasonally adjusted energy prices for the United States
over the course of the relevant period; and
(B) shall reduce the energy utility's requested increase in
basic rates and charges to the point at which the increase,
upon full implementation, will not exceed the average
monthly percentage change in seasonally adjusted energy
prices for the United States over the course of the relevant
period.
SECTION 3. IC 8-1-7.9-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.217-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 22. (a) This section applies to an energy utility
that petitions the commission for approval of a project to serve a large
load customer.
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


(b) An energy utility may submit to the commission a petition for
approval of a project to serve a large load customer only if the
following are satisfied:
(1) The petition concerns serving the energy needs of a large load
customer.
(2) The large load customer commits to significant and
meaningful financial assurances that must:
(A) include reimbursement by the large load customer of at
least eighty percent (80%) of the all project costs reasonably
allocable to the large load customer; and
(B) afford protections for the energy utility's existing and
future customers from project costs reasonably allocable to the
large load customer regardless of whether the large load
customer ultimately takes service in the anticipated amount
and within the anticipated time frame.
(3) At least thirty (30) days before the energy utility's submission
of the petition to the commission, the energy utility held at least
one (1) pre-filing meeting with:
(A) the corporation;
(B) the office;
(C) the office of utility consumer counselor;
(D) the appropriate regional transmission organization; and
(E) the large load customer;
to review the project.
(c) An energy utility may petition the commission for approval of a
project to serve:
(1) one (1) or more large load customers at one (1) or more
locations; or
(2) not more than four (4) customers whose aggregate demand
satisfies the amount set forth in section 10(1) of this chapter.
In any case in which more than one (1) large load customer is to be
served by a project, a reference in this chapter to one (1) large load
customer is a reference to all large load customers to be served by the
project, in accordance with IC 1-1-4-1(3).
(d) In submitting a petition to the commission under this section, an
energy utility must demonstrate that the large load customer and the
associated projects meet the requirements of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 8-1-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10.5. Utility Transparency and Reporting
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "affiliate" means any person
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


who directly or indirectly:
(1) controls;
(2) is controlled by; or
(3) is under the common control of;
another person.
(b) The term includes a parent company or a subsidiary.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
Indiana utility regulatory commission created by IC 8-1-1-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "utility" means a public utility
(as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a)) that:
(1) provides retail:
(A) electric; or
(B) natural gas;
service to the public; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
Sec. 4. (a) The commission may not authorize a utility to recover
through the utility's retail rates and charges any direct or indirect
costs associated with the following:
(1) Membership dues, sponsorship fees, or monetary
contributions paid to:
(A) a business or industry trade group or association; or
(B) a not-for-profit affiliate of the utility.
(2) Lobbying, legislative action, or other political activities,
including research, analysis, preparation, planning, or other
activities undertaken in support of lobbying or legislative
action.
(3) Advertising, marketing, or communications undertaken to
influence public opinion.
(4) Travel, lodging, or food and beverage expenses for:
(A) the utility's officers or board of directors; or
(B) the officers or board of directors of an affiliate of the
utility.
(5) Entertainment or gifts.
(6) Leasing, owning, or chartering an aircraft for use by:
(A) the utility's officers or board of directors; or
(B) the officers or board of directors of an affiliate of the
utility.
(7) Charitable giving, including contributions to any
not-for-profit organization exempt from federal income
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal
Revenue Code, and any expenses related to charitable giving.
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


(8) Compensation paid to an employee, if any portion of the
employee's time in a given year is spent on lobbying,
legislative action, or other political activities.
(9) Compensation paid to an employee, if any portion of the
employee's time in a given year is spent litigating or appealing
legislation or commission rulings.
(10) Litigation regarding existing or proposed statutes,
regulations, ordinances, or legislation at the federal, state, or
local level.
(11) Any expenses related to:
(A) products;
(B) services; or
(C) programs;
that are not regulated by the commission, including any
marketing, administrative, or customer service related
expenses for such products, services, or programs.
(12) Investor relations.
(b) Beginning in 2026, a utility shall file with the commission, at
the time and in the form and manner prescribed by the
commission, an annual report that includes the following
information concerning each activity or expense described in
subsection (a):
(1) For each expense or activity described in subsection (a),
the total costs to:
(A) the utility; or
(B) an affiliate of the utility;
that are directly billed or allocated to the utility. The amounts
set forth under this subdivision must be separately delineated
for each expense or activity described in subsection (a).
(2) The job title, job description, and salary of any employee
of the utility who performed work associated with the
activities described in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(8), (a)(9),
(a)(10), (a)(11), or (a)(12) for the utility, along with the
number of hours attributable to such work by the employee.
(3) The job title, job description, and salary of any employee
of an affiliate of the utility who performed work associated
with the activities described in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(8),
(a)(9), (a)(10), (a)(11), or (a)(12), along with the number of
hours attributable to such work by the employee, to the extent
that the costs associated with the work are directly billed or
allocated to the utility.
(4) An itemized list of the amounts billed or allocated to the
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


utility by third party vendors for any expenses or activities
described in subsection (a), including unredacted billing
amounts, billing dates, payees, and explanations of each
expenditure in sufficient detail to indicate the expenditure's
purpose, including, if applicable, all Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission Uniform System of Account codes for
which payment to the vendor was recorded.
(5) A list of all divisions, departments, or other organizational
groups within the utility that performed any activities
described in subsection (a). For each division, department, or
group identified, the utility shall include a list of the
employees who work in the division, department, or group.
For each employee listed, the utility shall provide the
following information:
(A) The employee's job title.
(B) A job description sufficient to describe the employee's
responsibilities.
(C) An identification of each activity described in
subsection (a) in which the employee engages, including a
description sufficient to describe the nature of each
activity.
(D) The employee's total annual compensation and the
percentage of that compensation paid for work associated
with activities described in subsection (a), including, if
applicable, all Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Uniform System of Account codes for which payment to
the employee was recorded.
(c) The commission shall make available on the commission's
website a direct link to the annual reports provided by utilities
under this section, subject to the commission's duty to redact or
exclude any information that the commission is prohibited from
disclosing under state or federal law.
SECTION 5. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "commission" refers to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission created by IC 8-1-1-2.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "committee" refers to the interim
study committee on energy, utilities, and telecommunications
established by IC 2-5-1.3-4.
(c) As used in this SECTION, "tracker" means a periodic rate
adjustment mechanism that:
(1) is approved by the commission; and
(2) allows a utility to recover or pass through specific
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101


expenses or capital investments on a periodic basis outside of
a base rate case.
(d) As used in this SECTION, "utility" means a public utility (as
defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a)) that:
(1) provides retail:
(A) electric; or
(B) natural gas;
service to the public; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
(e) The legislative council is urged to assign to the committee the
task of studying, during the 2026 legislative interim, the use of
trackers by utilities, including an examination of the following:
(1) The types of expenses and investments that utilities
recover through trackers.
(2) For each utility whose rates and charges include one (1) or
more active trackers:
(A) the number and types of trackers used; and
(B) the impact of those trackers on customer bills, broken
down by customer class.
(3) For utilities that provide electric utility service, the
benefits and drawbacks of trackers with respect to the
provision of electric utility service with the attributes set forth
in IC 8-1-2-0.6, including:
(A) reliability;
(B) affordability;
(C) resiliency;
(D) stability; and
(E) environmental sustainability.
(4) Any other issues concerning use of trackers by utilities
that the committee considers appropriate.
(f) If the legislative council assigns the topic set forth in
subsection (e) to the committee, the committee may consult with or
invite comments from:
(1) the commission;
(2) the office of utility consumer counselor;
(3) utilities;
(4) organizations representing ratepayers; or
(5) other stakeholders.
(g) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 234—LS 6833/DI 101